District of Columbia statutes.
44-503

Authority of Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor shall:

(1)

Ensure that licensing rules are consistent with certificate of need rules and that both are designed to facilitate the goals and objectives of the District of Columbia’s state health plan and certificate of need program; and

(2)

Conduct an initial inventory of facilities to determine actual physical bed capacity and operating bed capacity.

(b)

The Mayor shall have the authority to license bed capacity by specific, well-defined services. For hospitals, licensure by type of service shall be limited to the following categories: Medical/surgical; ICU/coronary care; OB/GYN; nursery; intermediate neonatal and neonatal intensive care; pediatrics; alcoholism/chemical dependency; rehabilitation; and psychiatric.

History

Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 4, 30 DCR 5778

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1303.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Health-Care and Community Residence Facility, Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of 1983, see Mayor’s Order 84-105, June 19, 1984.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 5-48, the “Health Care and Community Residence License Act of 1983”, see Mayor’s Order 98-137, August 20, 1998 ( 45 DCR 6587).
Delegation of authority under Health-Care and Community Residence Facility, Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of 1983, see Mayor’s Order 84-105, June 19, 1984.